Utah statutes.
31A-9-402.   Communications to members.

(1)  A fraternal may provide in its laws for an official publication in which any notice, report, or statement required by law to be given to members, including a notice of election, may be published.  Any required notice shall be printed conspicuously in the publication.

(2)  The commissioner may by rule prescribe that copies of specified classes of communications published generally to members, including the official publication, be sent to the commissioner when they are sent to the members.

(3)  If the records of a fraternal show that two or more members have the same mailing address, an official publication mailed to one member is considered to be notice to all members at the same address, unless a member requests a separate copy.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

